Georgia, session 2025_26, SB127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 13 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to contracts, is amended by
revising Chapter 12, relating to automatic renewal provisions, as follows:
"CHAPTER 12
13-12-1.
As used in this chapter, the term:
(1) 'Automatic renewal provision' means a provision under which a service contract is
renewed for a specified period of more than one month if the renewal causes the service
- 1 -

LC 55 0502S
contract to be in effect more than six months after the day of the initiation of the service
contract. Such renewal is effective unless the consumer or small business gives notice
to the seller of the consumer's or small business's intention to terminate the service
contract.
(2) 'Consumer' means a natural person or a nonprofit organization exempt from taxation
under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 receiving service,
maintenance, or repair benefits under a service contract. The term does not include a
natural person engaged in business or employed by or otherwise acting on behalf of a
governmental entity if the person enters into the service contract as part of or ancillary
to the person's business activities or on behalf of the business or governmental entity.
(3) 'Seller' means any person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation engaged in
commerce that sells, leases, or offers to sell or lease any service to a consumer or small
business pursuant to a service contract.
(4) 'Service contract' means a written contract for the performance of services for a
specified period of time.
(5) 'Small business' means a business that is independently owned and operated, is not
dominant in its field of operation, and employs fewer than 200 employees.
13-12-2.
Any seller that sells, leases, or offers to sell or lease any service to a consumer or small
business pursuant to a service contract that has an automatic renewal provision shall
disclose the automatic renewal provision clearly and conspicuously in the contract or
contract offer.
13-12-3.
(a) Any seller that sells, leases, or offers to sell or lease any service to a consumer or small
business pursuant to a service contract for a specified period of 12 months or more and that
- 2 -

LC 55 0502S
automatically renews for a specified period of more than one month, unless the consumer
or small business cancels the contract, shall provide the consumer or small business with
written or electronic notification of the automatic renewal provision. Notification shall be
provided to the consumer or small business no less than 30 days or no more than 60 days
before the cancellation deadline pursuant to the automatic renewal provision. Such
notification shall disclose clearly and conspicuously:
(1) That unless the consumer or small business cancels the contract, the contract will
automatically renew; and
(2) The methods by which the consumer or small business may obtain details of the
automatic renewal provision and cancellation procedure, including contacting the seller
at a specified telephone number or address, referring to the contract, or any other method.
(b) For any contract for service to a consumer or small business that automatically renews
for a specified period of more than 24 months, the seller shall, in addition to providing the
notification required under subsection (a) of this Code section, obtain the following for the
automatic renewal provision of such contract to be enforceable:
(1) Written or electronic acknowledgment from the consumer or small business of
receipt of the notification required under subsection (a) of this Code section; and
(2) An affirmative written or electronic response that the consumer or small business
does not intend to terminate the service contract.
13-12-4.
This chapter shall not apply to:
(1) A financial institution as provided in Chapter 1 or 2 of Title 7 or any depository
institution as defined in 12 U.S.C. Section 1813(c)(2);
(2) A foreign bank maintaining a branch or agency licensed under the laws of any state
of the United States;
- 3 -

LC 55 0502S
(3) Any subsidiary or affiliate of an entity provided in paragraph (1) or (2) of this Code
section;
(4) Any electric utility as provided in Chapter 3 of Title 46;
(5) Any entity regulated pursuant to Chapter 45 of Title 43; or
(6) Any county, municipal corporation, authority, or local government or governing
body; or
(7) Any service contract between a seller and a small business wherein the small
business is required to pay more than $200.00 in consideration on a monthly basis for the
services to be provided thereunder or the equivalent thereof for any other installment
period provided in such service contract.
13-12-5.
A violation of this chapter renders the automatic renewal provision of a contract void and
unenforceable."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026, and shall apply to service contracts entered
into on or after such date.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 4 -